Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 41

Local Correctional Facilities

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-41-101. Good time allowance.

An inmate committed by any court in Arkansas to a county jail or city jail in the State of Arkansas may be entitled to a reduction, to be known as “meritorious good time”, from his or her maximum term of his or her sentence to be served in the county jail or city jail.

(1)Meritorious good time shall be awarded under the rules and regulations promulgated by the county sheriff or chief of police and approved by the county quorum court of the various counties or the city legislative body of the various cities.

Meritorious good time shall be administered by the county sheriff or chief of police, subject to this subchapter, for good discipline, good behavior, work practices, and job responsibilities within the county jail or city jail.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 639, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-424, 46-425; Acts 2015, No. 738, § 1.

12-41-102. Good time — Classification of inmates.

There is established a classification committee consisting of such persons as the county sheriff or chief of police may designate.

The committee shall meet as often as necessary to classify the inmates of the county jail or city jail into one (1) of three (3) classes according to behavior, good discipline, and job responsibility.

(1)Inmates in Class I shall be allowed to earn a one-day reduction for each day served.

Inmates in Class II shall be allowed to earn a ten-days' reduction for each month served.

Inmates in Class III shall not be entitled to earn meritorious good time.

Inmates of the county jail or city jail may be reclassified as often as the committee deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter and to maintain good discipline and efficiency at the county or city jail.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 639, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-427; Acts 2015, No. 738, § 2.

12-41-103. Good time — Forfeiture and restoration.

All meritorious good time shall be forfeited by the inmate in the event of escape, and all or part of the accrued meritorious good time may be taken away by the county sheriff or chief of police for infraction of rules.

However, in the event of escape, the county sheriff or chief of police may restore all or part of any accrued meritorious good time if the escapee returns to the institution voluntarily, without expense to the county or city, and without any act of violence while a fugitive from the institution.

In other instances, the county sheriff or chief of police may restore lost meritorious good time according to rules approved by the county quorum court or city legislative body.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 639, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-426.

12-41-104. Emergency furloughs.

Under rules prescribed by the county sheriff or chief of police, and approved by the county quorum court or city legislative body, the county sheriff or chief of police may authorize emergency furloughs, under reasonable conditions, for inmates for occasions such as serious illness or death of a member of the inmate's family or other proper emergency.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 639, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-428.

12-41-105. Commissions from prisoner telephone services and profits from prisoner commissary services.

Commissions derived from prisoner telephone services and profits earned from prisoner commissary services provided in the various county and regional detention facilities in the state shall be deposited with the county treasurer of the county in which the county or regional detention facility is located, and the county treasurer shall credit the funds to the county sheriff's office fund.

The county sheriff's office fund is an agency fund defined by the County Financial Management System as a fund used to account for funds held by the county treasurer as an agent for a governmental unit until transferred by check or county court order to the county sheriff or other governmental unit for the intended uses of the funds.

The transfer of funds to the county sheriff or other governmental unit under this subsection is not subject to an appropriation by the quorum court or to the county claims process.

Arkansas Legislative Audit shall review actions described in this subsection for substantial compliance with this section.

Of the commissions and profits deposited into the county sheriff's office fund in each county under subsection (a) of this section, one hundred percent (100%) shall be credited to the county sheriff's office communications facility and equipment fund under § 21-6-307.

Each county sheriff's office shall allocate for the maintenance and operation of the county jail up to seventy-five percent (75%) of the commissions and profits deposited into the county sheriff's office communications facility and equipment fund.

This section does not apply to funds derived from prisoner telephone services or prisoner commissary services provided in Division of Correction facilities or Division of Community Correction facilities or in municipally owned detention facilities or in county detention facilities in counties with a population of one hundred seventy-five thousand (175,000) or more according to the latest federal decennial census.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “service profits and prisoner commissary” in the section heading; redesignated and rewrote former (a) as (a)(1); added (a)(2) and (3); in (b)(1), inserted “and profits”, inserted “county” preceding “sheriff's office” twice, substituted “under subsection (a)” for “pursuant to subsection (a)”, and added “under §21-6-307” at the end; rewrote (b)(2); and, in (c), substituted “This section does not” for “The provisions of this section do not” and inserted “or prisoner commissary services”.

The 2017 amendment inserted “county or regional” before “detention facility” in (a)(1); in (a)(2)(B), substituted “The county sheriff's office fund and the transfer of funds under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section are not” for “As an agency fund, the transfer of funds is not”; and, in (a)(3), inserted “actions described in this subsection”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 372 substituted “services and profits from” for “service profits and” in the section heading; inserted “or other governmental unit” in (a)(2)(A); and substituted “The transfer of funds to the county sheriff or other governmental unit under this subsection is not subject” for “The county sheriff's office fund and the transfer of funds under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section are not subject” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (c).

Shall have access to the information necessary to comply with Medicaid requirements; and

May provide and receive information in connection with establishing and maintaining Medicaid eligibility, including confidential information.

The county sheriff or the keeper of the jail or his or her designee may access information necessary to determine if a Medicaid application has been filed on behalf of the inmate.

Access under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be to:

Establish Medicaid eligibility;

Provide healthcare services; or

Pay for healthcare services.

To the extent feasible, the Department of Human Services shall allow an online application for Medicaid coverage and benefits to be submitted up to forty-five (45) days prior to the release of an inmate or offender who is in the custody of the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction and who was not previously qualified or previously qualified and subsequently suspended.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (e).

“Healthcare professional” means an individual or entity that is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession or as a function of an entity's administration of the practice of medicine;

“Local correctional facility” means a county jail, a city jail, regional jail, criminal justice center, or county house of correction that is not operated by the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, or a federal correctional agency; and

“Medicaid reimbursement rate” means the prevailing cost paid by the Arkansas Medicaid Program for a particular medical service or treatment established by the Division of Medical Services in the Arkansas Medicaid Program fee schedules for a particular medical service, treatment, or medical code.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a)(2).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 996, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 520, § 1; 1997, No. 1287, § 1; 2015, No. 741, § 1; 2017, No. 250, § 26; 2019, No. 372, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 837.

12-41-106. Medicaid eligibility of an inmate in a local correctional facility.

If an inmate in a local correctional facility receives medical services that meet criteria for Medicaid coverage, the local correctional facility may apply for Medicaid coverage under this section.

(1)The inmate may designate a representative for the purposes of filing a Medicaid application and complying with Medicaid requirements for determining and maintaining eligibility.

However, the local correctional facility having custody of the inmate shall be the authorized representative for purposes of establishing and maintaining Medicaid eligibility under this subsection if:

The inmate does not designate a representative within three (3) business days after request; or

The representative designated under subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not file a Medicaid application within three (3) business days after appointment and request.

An authorized representative under this section:

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1117, § 1; 2015, No. 895, § 13.

12-41-107. Medical services billing to a local correctional facility — Definitions.

As used in this section:

A healthcare professional that provides medical service or treatment to a local correctional facility under this chapter for the benefit of an inmate housed in a local correctional facility for which the local correctional facility is responsible for payment shall not charge the local correctional facility more than the Medicaid reimbursement rate for the same or similar medical service or treatment.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 14; 2019, No. 910, § 838.

12-41-108. Behavioral health and risk screening tool — Database entry.

A local correctional facility is encouraged to:

Adopt independently, or in collaboration with other local correctional facilities or nongovernmental law enforcement entities, a screening tool designed to screen inmates or other detainees for a behavioral health impairment, substance abuse issues, and criminogenic risk; and

Utilize the database maintained by the Arkansas Crime Information Center under § 12-12-219 concerning entry of data and information collected from inmates at a local correctional facility.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Texas has enacted legislation contemplated by this subchapter. See Tex. Loc. Gov't. Code § 361.021 et seq.

Cross References. Bi-State Criminal Justice Center Compact, §12-49-301.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 423, § 12.

Subchapter 2

— Criminal Justice Centers

12-41-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Law” means a statute of a state, a written opinion of a court of record, a municipal ordinance, a county quorum court ordinance, or a rule authorized by and lawfully adopted pursuant to a statute; and

“Municipality” means an incorporated city or town.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1601.

12-41-202. Authority to contract — Prerequisites.

A county in this state and a municipality in that county, both located on the state line, may contract with an adjoining county and any municipality in that county located on the other side of the state line for the joint construction, financing, operation, and management of a justice center to be located on the state line.

A county and a municipality in this state may contract with a county and a municipality in an adjoining state as provided by subsection (a) of this section and § 12-41-204 only if the other state enacts legislation relating to the establishment of a justice center pursuant to a contract as provided in those sections that:

Provides for joint responsibility of the county sheriffs of the two (2) counties over the operation of a jail, lockup, or other detention facility in the center and persons in custody in the facility or for the hiring of a jailer with those responsibilities;

Provides for the application and enforcement of the law of both states in the manner provided by § 12-41-206;

Provides that a person in custody in the center under Arkansas law may be prosecuted for an offense against Arkansas law without extradition of that person, as provided by § 12-41-208;

Provides that a person in custody in the center under Arkansas law may not be prosecuted for an offense against the law of the other state without extradition of that person or personally served with process in the center for a proceeding in the other state;

Provides that a person summoned to appear in the center under Arkansas law may not be personally served with process in any part of the center for a proceeding in the other state and may be arrested in any part of the center for an offense against Arkansas law and prosecuted for that offense without extradition of the person if the person is physically present in any part of the center or in Arkansas at the time of the prosecution, as provided by § 12-41-209;

Provides that a person summoned to appear in the center under Arkansas law may not be arrested in any part of the center for an offense against the law of the other state;

Provides that center personnel or a peace officer of either state may transfer across the state line in the center a person in custody in the center under the law of either state and may exercise control over that person on both sides of the state line in the center, as provided by § 12-41-208;

Provides that a person in the center who is not confined in the center, taken to the center under arrest, or summoned to appear in the center, may be arrested in any part of the center for an offense against the laws of either state without extradition of that person, and that extradition of a person who was arrested in the center under those circumstances is not required in order for the person to be prosecuted for an offense against the law of either state if the person is physically present in any part of the center or the state of the prosecution at the time of the prosecution, as provided by § 12-41-208;

Authorizes a peace officer of either state, under Arkansas law, to arrest a person in any part of the center for an offense against Arkansas law if a peace officer of Arkansas would be authorized to make that arrest in the part of the center in Arkansas as provided by § 12-41-210; and

Authorizes a peace officer of either state, under the law of the other state, to arrest a person in any part of the center for an offense against the law of the other state if a peace officer of the other state would be authorized to make that arrest in the part of the center in the other state, as provided by § 12-41-210.

A county and municipality in this state may contract for the center to contain:

Courtrooms and office space needed by county, district, and appellate courts;

Jail, lockup, and other detention facilities;

Federal, county, precinct, and municipal offices for prosecuting attorneys and other personnel as needed;

Adult or juvenile probation offices;

Any other offices that either the county or municipality is separately authorized or required to operate or provide; and

Parking space, dining areas, and other facilities incidental to operation of the center.

The contracting parties may provide in the contract the manner of determining the personnel policies and employment benefit programs for center personnel.

Property that is ordered by a court to be produced in the center or that is in the possession of a peace officer or a party to a proceeding for use as evidence before a court holding a proceeding in the center is constructively present in the state of the court.

Property in the center that is not covered by subsection (c), subsection (d), or subsection (e) of this section is constructively present in both states.

The law of a state in which property is constructively present applies to that property to the same extent that such law would apply if the property were actually present in that state.

If property is constructively present in only one (1) state, the law of the state in which the property is not constructively present may be applied to that property only to the extent that such law would apply if the property were actually outside that state.

Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, the courts of both states have concurrent jurisdiction over the geographic area of both states in the center, but the state in which a prosecution is first instituted for an offense committed in the center retains jurisdiction to apply that state's law to the exclusion of the other state's jurisdiction, unless the prosecution is terminated without jeopardy attaching under the law of the state of the first prosecution.

For the purposes of this subchapter, a prosecution is commenced in this state on the filing of an indictment, information, or complaint as determined by applicable provisions of Arkansas law.

May be personally served in any part of the center for a proceeding in Arkansas.

Is constructively present in Arkansas while that person is appearing under the summons in the part of the center in the other state;

Without extradition, may be arrested in any part of the center for an offense against Arkansas law and prosecuted for that offense if that person is physically present in any part of the center or in Arkansas at the time of the prosecution; and

May be personally served with process in any part of the center for a proceeding in Arkansas.

A person who is summoned to appear in the center under the law of the other state:

Is constructively present in the other state while that person is appearing under the summons in the part of the center in Arkansas;

Without extradition, may not be arrested under Arkansas law in any part of the center for an offense against Arkansas law; and

May not be personally served with process in any part of the center for a proceeding in Arkansas.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter may be impliedly repealed by subchapter 5 of this chapter.

Cross References. County farm, §12-42-103.

Effective Dates. Acts 1868, No. 27, § 21: effective on passage.

(1)Arkansas agrees that a person who is summoned to appear in the center under the law of the other state may be arrested in any part of the center for an offense against the law of the other state and prosecuted for that offense without extradition if that person is physically present in any part of the center or the other state at the time of the prosecution.

(1)If a person in the center is constructively present in one (1) state under this section, the law of the state in which the person is not constructively present may be applied to that person only to the extent that such law would apply if the person were actually outside that state.

If the other state enacts legislation as provided in § 12-41-202, a peace officer of Arkansas may:

Arkansas agrees that a peace officer of the other state may arrest a person under:

(1)The county courts of the several counties in this state shall purchase a farm or tract of land within the boundaries of the county and provide for the erection on the farm or tract of land a house of correction.

(1)The county court may appoint three (3) discreet persons as commissioners, who shall be taxpayers and qualified voters of this state, to select and agree for the purchase of a farm or tract of land as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

The deed of conveyance shall be in such form and shall be taken in such manner as is provided by law in such cases.

Publisher's Notes. This section may be affected by §12-42-103.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, §§ 2, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-1602, 46-1609.

12-41-203. Terms of contract.

The contract must provide that the county sheriffs of the two (2) counties are jointly responsible for operation of any jail, lockup, or other detention facility in the justice center and the custody, care, and treatment of persons in custody in the facility or must provide for the hiring of a jailer with those responsibilities.

The contracting parties may specify in the contract the manner of determining the persons responsible for:

The operation, alteration, maintenance, cleaning, and repair of the facilities;

The employment of center personnel;

The purchase of materials, supplies, tools, and other equipment to be jointly used by offices provided or used by the contracting parties;

The preparing of reports to the governing bodies of the contracting parties;

Joint recordkeeping, communications, or dispatch systems; and

The performance of any other powers or duties relating to operation of the center.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, §§ 2, 4-6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-1602, 46-1604 — 46-1606; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 19.

12-41-204. Financing.

The governing body of a municipality or county contracting, as provided by §§12-41-202 and12-41-203, may finance its share of the construction, financing, operation, or management of the justice center by any means that it could finance the type of facilities in the center to be used or provided by the municipality or county.

The contract may take advantage of the availability of federal funds to finance any part of the center.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1603.

12-41-205. Use of center by courts.

A circuit court or district court having jurisdiction in the county or municipality in which a part of the justice center is located may maintain offices and courtrooms and hold proceedings at the center.

(1)A court of this state may not hold proceedings in the part of the center located in the other state.

Courts of the other state may hold proceedings in the part of the center in this state if so authorized by the other state.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1602.

12-41-206. Determination of applicable law.

(1)Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, the law of both states regarding rights, duties, liabilities, privileges, and immunities arising from conduct applies to conduct in any part of the justice center.

If, however, it is impossible for a person to conform his or her conduct in the center to the law of both states, that person may choose which state's law governs that conduct.

If a person chooses to conform his or her conduct in the center to the law of the other state, the conflicting law of this state does not apply to that conduct.

The physical plant of the center and equipment and facilities used by personnel of both states employed at the center are constructively present in both states.

Except as provided by subsection (d) of this section, property in any part of the center that is owned by or in the possession of a person in custody or summoned to appear in the center is constructively present in the state under the law of which the person was taken into custody or summoned to appear.

(1)Possession of property that constitutes an offense committed in the center is conduct to which subsection (a) of this section applies.

A person's exercise of a duty in regard to property in the center is conduct to which subsection (a) of this section applies.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1607.

12-41-207. Custody in center.

A person who is in the justice center in the custody of a peace officer or center personnel under Arkansas law:

Is constructively present in Arkansas while that person is in custody in the part of the center in the other state;

May be prosecuted for an offense against Arkansas law without extradition of that person; and

A person who is in the center in the custody of a peace officer or center personnel under the law of the other state:

Is constructively present in the other state while that person is in custody in the part of the center in Arkansas;

May not be prosecuted for an offense against Arkansas law without extradition of that person; and

May not be personally served with process in any part of the center for a proceeding in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1608.

12-41-208. Extradition and transfer.

Arkansas agrees that a person who is in the justice center in the custody of a peace officer or center personnel under the law of the other state may be:

Prosecuted for an offense against the law of the other state without extradition of that person; and

Personally served with process in any part of the center for a proceeding in the other state.

Center personnel or a peace officer of either state may transfer across the state line in the center a person in custody in the center under the law of either state and may exercise control over that person on both sides of the state line in the center.

(1)A person in the center who has not been confined in the center, taken to the center under arrest or summoned to appear in the center, may be arrested in any part of the center for an offense against the law of either state without extradition of that person.

Extradition of a person who was arrested in the center under those circumstances is not required in order to prosecute the person for an offense against the law of either state if the person is physically present in any part of the center or the state of the prosecution at the time of the prosecution.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Governor of this state may recognize a demand for the extradition of a person charged with a crime in the other state if the demand alleges that any element of the offense occurred in any part of the center.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1608.

12-41-209. Service of process.

(1)A person who is summoned to appear in the justice center under Arkansas law:

Arkansas agrees that a person who is summoned to appear in the center under the law of the other state may be personally served with process in any part of the center for a proceeding in the other state.

However, the law applicable to that person's conduct in the center is governed by §12-41-206, and whether extradition is required to arrest or prosecute that person for an offense committed in the center is governed by this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1608.

12-41-210. Right of arrest.

Arrest a person under Arkansas law in the part of the center in the other state for an offense against Arkansas law if that peace officer would be authorized to make that arrest in the part of the center in Arkansas; and

Arrest a person under the law of the other state in any part of the center for an offense against the law of the other state if a peace officer of the other state would be authorized to make that arrest in the part of the center in the other state.

Arkansas law in any part of the center for an offense against Arkansas law if a peace officer of Arkansas would be authorized to make that arrest in the part of the center in Arkansas; and

The law of the other state in the part of the center in Arkansas for an offense against the law of the other state if that peace officer would be authorized to make that arrest in the part of the center in the other state.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 696, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1608.

Subchapter 3

— County Houses of Correction

12-41-301. Purchase of land.

However, the farm or tract of land shall not be purchased unless the taxpayers of each township in the county shall petition the county court to provide for the purchase. No farm shall be purchased unless a majority of all the taxpayers of the county sign the petitions.

When the commissioners have made a selection and agreement concerning the farm or tract of land, they shall report their doings to the county court.

If the court approves the selection and the stipulations of the commissioners concerning the payment for the land, then the court shall provide for the purchase of the land and take from the vendor of the land a good and sufficient deed of conveyance for the use of the county.

The farm or tract of land provided for in this section may be either improved or unimproved land, as the county court may in its discretion elect.

The farm or tract of land provided for in this section shall consist of such number of acres as the county court may in its discretion determine.

When the court determines to purchase the farm or tract of land, the court shall contract for the land on the most favorable terms possible to the county.

The court shall pay for the farm, and for the erection of the house of correction, in the same manner that other public county improvements are paid for.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 27, §§ 1-3, 6, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1950-1955, 1959; Pope's Dig., §§ 2479-2484, 2488; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-601 — 46-603, 46-606.

12-41-302. Construction of facility.

When any farm or tract of land has been purchased by the county court as provided in §12-41-301(a), the county court shall cause to be let out to the lowest bidder the contract for building and erecting on the tract of land a house of correction.

The house of correction shall be so constructed as to secure, as nearly as may be, all persons sentenced to confinement therein and shall be composed of such material and of such form and dimensions as the court shall direct.

The house of correction shall possess such means of ventilation and other sanitary arrangements as will promote the health of the prisoners therein confined.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 27, §§ 4, 7, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1956, 1957, 1960; Pope's Dig., §§ 2485, 2486, 2489; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-604, 46-607.

12-41-303. Contracts governed by existing laws.

All contracts, appropriations, and disbursements of money concerning the purchase of the land or farm provided for in §12-41-301 and the erection of the house of correction shall be made according to and be governed by the laws concerning public county contracts, appropriations, and disbursements.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 27, § 5, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., § 1958; Pope's Dig., § 2487; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-605.

12-41-304. Supervision by court.

The county court shall have general supervisory control over the farm and house of correction and shall take means to correct any mismanagement of the facilities.

With the advice of the superintendent, the county court shall prescribe, from time to time, such rules for the government and discipline of prisoners in the house of correction and for the discipline and control of the labor of the prisoner, as the county court shall deem most expedient and wholesome.

The superintendent shall be responsible to the county court for the correct treatment of all prisoners confined in the house of correction and for the faithful enforcement of the rules and discipline.

For neglect of duty or other improper management of the house of correction, the county court may remove the superintendent.

The county court shall determine the compensation of the superintendent.

Cross References. County jail, use by municipality, §14-55-602.

Effective Dates. Acts 1875, p. 1, § 95: effective on passage.

Acts 1895, No. 72, § 5: effective on passage.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 27, §§ 11, 14, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1966, 1969; Pope's Dig., §§ 2495, 2498; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-611, 46-614.

12-41-305. Superintendent.

The county court of any county in which any house of correction shall be erected shall appoint a discreet person, who shall be a qualified elector of this state and who shall be known as the superintendent of the house of correction.

The superintendent shall have charge of the farm or lands attached to the house of correction and shall direct the labor of all persons sentenced to confinement in the house of correction.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 27, §§ 10, 12, 20, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1963-1965, 1967; Pope's Dig., §§ 2492-2494, 2496; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-610, 46-612, 46-620.

12-41-306. Commitment to house of correction.

When any house of correction has been erected as provided for in §12-41-302, all persons who shall be convicted of petit larceny or any other crime cognizable before justices of the peace, and sentenced to imprisonment, shall be sentenced to confinement in the house of correction instead of the county jail.

All persons then confined in the county jail for the crime of petit larceny or for any other crime cognizable before justices of the peace shall be transferred by order of the county court to the house of correction.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 27, § 8, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., § 1961; Pope's Dig., § 2490; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-608.

12-41-307. Labor of inmates.

All persons sentenced to confinement in the house of correction shall be compelled to labor on the farm or lands on which the house of correction shall be situated in such manner as is provided for in subsection (c) of this section and for the term of their imprisonment.

Prisoners confined in the house of correction shall labor for such number of hours each day as the county court may determine.

The prisoners shall be compelled to perform any and all such labors as pertain to the clearing, improvement, and cultivation of the farm and garden or to mechanical pursuits.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 27, §§ 9, 13, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1962, 1968; Pope's Dig., §§ 2491, 2497; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-609, 46-613.

12-41-308. Products of labor — Application.

The product of all labor of the prisoners confined in the house of correction shall be applied, under the direction of the county courts, to the payment of the expenses of the persons so confined and such other expenses as may be necessarily incurred in improving and keeping the house and farm in repair.

If the product of labor of persons confined in the house of correction shall not be sufficient to defray the expenses indicated in subsection (a) of this section, then the deficit shall be supplied out of the county treasury in such manner as prisoners in the county jail are now supplied.

If the products of the labor of persons confined in the house of correction shall be more than sufficient to defray the expenses indicated in subsection (a) of this section, then the surplus of such products shall be disposed of under the direction of the county court, and the proceeds thereof shall be paid into the county treasury.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 27, §§ 15-17, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1970-1972; Pope's Dig., §§ 2499-2501; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-615 — 46-617.

Subchapter 4

— City Jails

12-41-401. Erection and maintenance.

The city council shall have power to erect, establish, and maintain a city jail, which shall be in the keeping and under the control of the chief of police, under such rules and regulations as the city council may prescribe.

The city council shall provide one (1) or more watch houses or stations and shall also provide suitable rooms for holding the district court.

There shall be provided a separate apartment or ward for females in all city jails in cities of the first class.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 1, § 55, p. 1; 1895, No. 72, § 4, p. 94; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7708, 7736; Pope's Dig., §§ 9851, 9932; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-701, 46-706.

12-41-402. Food for prisoners.

It shall be the duty of the keeper of the city jail, watch, and station houses to provide all persons confined therein for any offense with necessary food during their confinement, and the cost thereof, not exceeding thirty cents (30¢) per day to each person, shall be taxed as costs in the case and paid to the keeper of the jail, watch, or station house out of the city treasury, on the certificate of the chief of police and approval of the mayor, when audited by the city council.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 1, § 55, p. 1; C. & M. Dig., § 7737; Pope's Dig., § 9933; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-702.